Utah statutes.
63A-3-308.   Judicial review -- Effect on lien.

(1)  A judicial review of an order of a hearing examiner may be obtained by any party filing a complaint with the district court.

(2) (a)  A notice of the filing of a complaint may be filed with the State Tax Commission.

(b)  If notice is filed, the tax commission may take no action with respect to the lien created by Section 63A-3-307 until the matter is finally disposed of by the courts, except as provided in this part.

